dev/postposition/postposition.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- सीत; सीत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सीत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्मन; सम्मन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्मन__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विना; विना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विना__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरी; सरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संगसगै; संगसगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संगसगै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाहीर; वाहीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाहीर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बमोजिन; बमोजिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बमोजिन__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्ति; जस्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्ति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्ता; जस्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्ता__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्मत; सम्मत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्मत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बमोजिम; बमोजिम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बमोजिम__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछाडिपट्टि; पछाडिपट्टि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछाडिपट्टि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मन्; मन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मन्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तर्फ; तर्फ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तर्फ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समेत; समेत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समेत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झैँ; झैँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झैँ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सहीत; सहीत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सहीत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- द्धारा; द्धारा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="द्धारा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पट्टी; पट्टी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पट्टी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्वन्धी; सम्वन्धी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्वन्धी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जत्रै; जत्रै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जत्रै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आवश्यकतानुसार; आवश्यकतानुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आवश्यकतानुसार__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- द्वारा; द्वारा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="द्वारा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निम्ती; निम्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निम्ती__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वस; वस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वस__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बित्तिक्कै; बित्तिक्कै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बित्तिक्कै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ताक; ताक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ताक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लाइ; लाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लाइ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नजिकै; नजिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नजिकै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संबन्धी; संबन्धी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संबन्धी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बापत; बापत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बापत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बीच-; बीच-; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बीच-__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वश; वश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वश__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिवाय; सिवाय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिवाय__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जैसे; जैसे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जैसे__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मास्तिर; मास्तिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मास्तिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उभो; उभो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उभो__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सङ्ग; सङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सङ्ग__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विच; विच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विच__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाहेक; बाहेक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाहेक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निम्ति; निम्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निम्ति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पटी; पटी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पटी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पनि; पनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पनि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछी; पछी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समेत्; समेत्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समेत्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काँ; काँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काँ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सीत"><i>सीत</i><par n="सीत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्मन"><i>सम्मन</i><par n="सम्मन__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विना"><i>विना</i><par n="विना__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सरी"><i>सरी</i><par n="सरी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संगसगै"><i>संगसगै</i><par n="संगसगै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वाहीर"><i>वाहीर</i><par n="वाहीर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बमोजिन"><i>बमोजिन</i><par n="बमोजिन__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्ति"><i>जस्ति</i><par n="जस्ति__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्ता"><i>जस्ता</i><par n="जस्ता__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्मत"><i>सम्मत</i><par n="सम्मत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बमोजिम"><i>बमोजिम</i><par n="बमोजिम__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पछाडिपट्टि"><i>पछाडिपट्टि</i><par n="पछाडिपट्टि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मन्"><i>मन्</i><par n="मन्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तर्फ"><i>तर्फ</i><par n="तर्फ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="समेत"><i>समेत</i><par n="समेत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="झैँ"><i>झैँ</i><par n="झैँ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सहीत"><i>सहीत</i><par n="सहीत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="द्धारा"><i>द्धारा</i><par n="द्धारा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पट्टी"><i>पट्टी</i><par n="पट्टी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्वन्धी"><i>सम्वन्धी</i><par n="सम्वन्धी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्रै"><i>जत्रै</i><par n="जत्रै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="आवश्यकतानुसार"><i>आवश्यकतानुसार</i><par n="आवश्यकतानुसार__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="द्वारा"><i>द्वारा</i><par n="द्वारा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्ती"><i>निम्ती</i><par n="निम्ती__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वस"><i>वस</i><par n="वस__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बित्तिक्कै"><i>बित्तिक्कै</i><par n="बित्तिक्कै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="ताक"><i>ताक</i><par n="ताक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लाइ"><i>लाइ</i><par n="लाइ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नजिकै"><i>नजिकै</i><par n="नजिकै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संबन्धी"><i>संबन्धी</i><par n="संबन्धी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बापत"><i>बापत</i><par n="बापत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बीच-"><i>बीच-</i><par n="बीच-__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वश"><i>वश</i><par n="वश__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सिवाय"><i>सिवाय</i><par n="सिवाय__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जैसे"><i>जैसे</i><par n="जैसे__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मास्तिर"><i>मास्तिर</i><par n="मास्तिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="उभो"><i>उभो</i><par n="उभो__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सङ्ग"><i>सङ्ग</i><par n="सङ्ग__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विच"><i>विच</i><par n="विच__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहेक"><i>बाहेक</i><par n="बाहेक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्ति"><i>निम्ति</i><par n="निम्ति__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पटी"><i>पटी</i><par n="पटी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पनि"><i>पनि</i><par n="पनि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पछी"><i>पछी</i><par n="पछी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="समेत्"><i>समेत्</i><par n="समेत्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="काँ"><i>काँ</i><par n="काँ__pst"/></e>
